Maine, session 132, LD687.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
CONCEPT DRAFT
SUMMARY
This bill is a concept draft pursuant to Joint Rule 208.
This bill would exert the State's ownership and jurisdiction over all waters within the
rise and fall of the tide seaward 12 nautical miles and all submerged lands and the
harvesting of marine resources from the coastline for a distance of 24 nautical miles. The
bill would also require the Office of the Attorney General to study the legal issues regarding
state ownership and sovereignty over marine resources beyond the 12-nautical-mile
territorial sea limit.
Page 1 - 132LR1261(01)